Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding ORS 311.701, the amount of $3,150,000 is transferred from
the Senior Property Tax Deferral Revolving Account  to the General Fund for general gov-
ernmental purposes. The transfer shall be made on the effective date of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 2. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Health Authority for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $3,000,000 for deposit into  the Healthy Homes Repair Fund,
established under  ORS 431A.402, to be used to support housing for seniors and individuals
with disabilities, including support through installation of accessibility modifications.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Revenue,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $150,000 to:
(1) Contract with a public benefit  corporation or consultant to increase knowledge of the
property tax programs under ORS 311.666 to 311.701 and 311.702 to 311.735 among  individuals
eligible for the programs by providing information to organizations of such individuals  or
entities that provide services to such individuals, which  may include financial and housing
counselors, insurance agents, accountants, financial advisers, senior services  agencies, re-
tired employees, community centers and community organizations  or senior fraternal or-
ganizations; and
(2) Report in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245 to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to revenue no later than  September 1, 2026, on the use of the
moneys under this section.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts,
marijuana tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and  Medicare receipts, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon
Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), collected or received by the Oregon Health  Authority,
for public health, is increased by  $3,000,000, for expenditure of moneys in the Healthy Homes
Repair Fund established under ORS 431A.402.
Enrolled House Bill 3506 (HB 3506-C) Page 1
Passed by House June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3506 (HB 3506-C) Page 2